North Dakota, session 69, SB2134.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 15-39.1-05.1 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. The authority to set policy for the fund rests in a board of trustees composed as follows:
a. The governor shall appoint, from a list of three nominees submitted to the governor by
North Dakota united, two board members who are actively employed as elementary or
secondary teachers in full-time positions not classified as school administrators. A board
member appointed under this subdivision who terminates employment may not continue
to serve as a member of the board.
b. The governor shall appoint, from a list of three nominees submitted to the governor by
the North Dakota council of educational leaders, one board member who is actively
employed as a full-time school administrator. A board member appointed under this
subdivision who terminates employment may not continue to serve as a member of the
board.
c. The governor shall appoint, from a list of three nominees submitted to the governor by
the North Dakota retired teachers association, two board members who are the retired
members of the fund.
d. The state treasurer, or a designee from the office of state treasurer, and the
superintendent of public instruction, or a designee from the department of public
instruction.

S. B. NO. 2134 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2134.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 75 Nays 9 Absent 10
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State